Florida, session 2026, HB941.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund
within the Executive Office of the Governor, which is to be
terminated pursuant to Section 19(f), Article III of the State
Constitution on February 17, 2026, is re-created.
Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 252.3711, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
252.3711 Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund.—
(3) In accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State
Constitution, the Emergency Preparedness and Response Fund
shall, unless terminated sooner, be terminated 4 years after the
effective date of this act. Before its scheduled termination,
the fund shall be reviewed as provided in s. 215.3206(1) and
(2).
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb941-00